New York, session 2025-2026, A901.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Aging in place task force. There is hereby established 2 within the office for the aging an aging in place task force. The 3 purpose of the task force shall be to study how the state can encourage 4 aging in place including, but not limited to, an examination of: 5 (a) infrastructure and transportation improvements; 6 (b) zoning changes to facilitate home care; 7 (c) enhanced nutrition programs and delivery options; 8 (d) improved fraud and abuse protections; 9 (e) expansion of home medical care options; 10 (f) tax incentives; and 11 (g) incentives for private insurance. 12 § 2. The aging in place task force shall consist of a total of four- 13 teen members and shall include: the commissioner of the state office of 14 temporary and disability assistance or the commissioner's designee; the 15 director of the office for the aging or the director's designee; the 16 chairperson and ranking member of the standing senate and assembly 17 committees of aging or their designees; two people appointed by the 18 governor; two people appointed by the temporary president of the senate; 19 one person appointed by the minority leader of the senate; two people 20 appointed by the speaker of the assembly; and one person appointed by 21 the minority leader of the assembly. The chairperson and ranking members 22 of the standing senate and assembly committees of aging and the appoint- 23 ees of the temporary president of the senate, minority leader of the 24 senate, speaker of the assembly and minority leader of the assembly may EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01877-01-5 A. 901 2 1 be members of the legislature. All appointments to the aging in place 2 task force shall be made no later than thirty days after the effective 3 date of this act. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authori- 4 ty. 5 § 3. There shall be two chairpersons selected from among the members 6 of the aging in place task force. One chairperson shall be selected by 7 the temporary president of the senate and one chairperson shall be 8 selected by the speaker of the assembly. Such chairperson shall schedule 9 the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held no later than 10 sixty days after the effective date of this act. 11 § 4. The members of the aging in place task force shall serve without 12 compensation, except that members shall be allowed their necessary and 13 actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under this 14 act. 15 § 5. The office for the aging shall provide the aging in place task 16 force with such facilities, assistance, and data as will enable such 17 task force to carry out its powers and duties. Additionally, all other 18 departments or agencies of the state or subdivisions thereof shall, at 19 the request of the chairpersons, provide such task force with such 20 facilities, assistance, and data as will enable such task force to carry 21 out its powers and duties. 22 § 6. The aging in place task force shall issue a report of its find- 23 ings and recommendations to the governor, the temporary president of the 24 senate and the speaker of the assembly no later than January 1, 2028. 25 § 7. The aging in place task force shall terminate on the date that it 26 submits the report required in section six of this act or December 31, 27 2028, whichever is later. 28 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately.